Hawaii statutes.
§16-22 Marking. The method of marking
a paper ballot shall be prescribed by the chief election officer by rules and
regulations promulgated in accordance with chapter 91. The chief election
officer shall prescribe a uniform method of marking the ballots in all
precincts in a county and for absentee voting by paper ballot. [L 1970, c 26,
pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Law Journals and Reviews

The Protection of Individual Rights Under Hawai‘i's Constitution. 14 UH
L. Rev. 311.

Case Notes

Casting of write-in votes not permitted. 70 H. 498, 776 P.2d
824.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next